Tennessee statutes. Title 54 Highways, Bridges And Ferries
Part 2

Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971 [Repealed]

54-2-201. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 1; T.C.A., § 54-213; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-202. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 2; T.C.A., § 54-214; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-203. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 3; T.C.A., § 54-215; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-204. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1972, ch. 829, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-216; Acts 1981, ch. 264, § 12; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-205. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 5; T.C.A., § 54-217; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-206. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 6; T.C.A., § 54-218; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-207. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 7; T.C.A., § 54-219; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-208. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 8; T.C.A., § 54-220; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.

54-2-209. [Repealed.]

Acts 1971, ch. 262, § 9; T.C.A., § 54-221; repealed by Acts 2013, ch. 203, § 1, effective April 23, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 308, § 24, effective July 1, 2013; and by Acts 2013, ch. 454, § 8, effective May 16, 2013.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 2, §§ 54-2-201 — 54-2-209, concerned the Access Improvement Fund Act of 1971.